District of Columbia statutes.
29A-301.67

Repealed

Foreign corporations — Change of corporate name.

Repealed.

Aug. 6, 1962, 76 Stat. 291, Pub. L. 87-569, § 67
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(l), 58 DCR 1720
1973 Ed., § 29-1067.
1981 Ed., § 29-568.
2001 Ed., § 29-301.67.